North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-12 Size, Width, and Height Restrictions
39-12-17.
Trial — Charges.

At the trial of the action, the court shall hear testimony concerning the facts and if it is found that such vehicle or vehicles were moved upon the highways, streets, or roads of this state at a weight in excess of the limitations imposed under the provisions of section 39-12-03 or as limited by the provisions of section 39-12-05, charges for the extraordinary use of the highways, streets, or roads must be assessed as follows:

The storage charges and costs of the action must be assessed; and

An additional charge must be assessed as follows:

1 to 1,000 pounds [.45 to 453.59 kilograms] of excess weight = $20 1,001 to 2,000 pounds [454.05 to 907.18 kilograms] of excess weight = $40 2,001 to 3,000 pounds [907.64 to 1360.78 kilograms] of excess weight = $60 3,001 to 4,000 pounds [1361.23 to 1814.37 kilograms] of excess weight = $140 4,001 to 5,000 pounds [1814.82 to 2267.96 kilograms] of excess weight = $220 5,001 to 6,000 pounds [2268.41 to 2721.55 kilograms] of excess weight = $305 6,001 to 7,000 pounds [2722.01 to 3175.14 kilograms] of excess weight = $380 7,001 to 8,000 pounds [3175.60 to 3628.74 kilograms] of excess weight = $495 8,001 to 9,000 pounds [3629.19 to 4082.33 kilograms] of excess weight = $575 9,001 to 10,000 pounds [4082.78 to 4535.92 kilograms] of excess weight = $655 10,001 to 11,000 pounds [4536.37 to 4989.51 kilograms] of excess weight = $1,100 11,001 to 12,000 pounds [4989.97 to 5443.10 kilograms] of excess weight = $1,200 12,001 to 13,000 pounds [5443.56 to 5896.70 kilograms] of excess weight = $1,300 13,001 to 14,000 pounds [5897.15 to 6350.29 kilograms] of excess weight = $1,680 14,001 to 15,000 pounds [6350.74 to 6803.88 kilograms] of excess weight = $1,800 15,001 to 16,000 pounds [6804.33 to 7257.47 kilograms] of excess weight = $1,920 16,001 to 17,000 pounds [7257.93 to 7711.06 kilograms] of excess weight = $2,550 17,001 to 18,000 pounds [7711.52 to 8164.66 kilograms] of excess weight = $2,700 18,001 to 19,000 pounds [8165.11 to 8618.25 kilograms] of excess weight = $2,850 19,001 to 20,000 pounds [8618.70 to 9071.84 kilograms] of excess weight = $3,000 20,001 to 21,000 pounds [9072.29 to 9525.43 kilograms] of excess weight = $4,200 21,001 to 22,000 pounds [9525.89 to 9979.02 kilograms] of excess weight = $4,400 22,001 to 23,000 pounds [9979.48 to 10432.62 kilograms] of excess weight = $4,600 23,001 to 24,000 pounds [10433.07 to 10886.21 kilograms] of excess weight = $4,800 24,001 to 25,000 pounds [10886.66 to 11339.80 kilograms] of excess weight = $5,000 25,001 to 26,000 pounds [11340.25 to 11793.40 kilograms] of excess weight = $5,200 26,001 to 27,000 pounds [11793.86 to 12246.99 kilograms] of excess weight = $5,400 27,001 to 28,000 pounds [12247.45 to 12700.59 kilograms] of excess weight = $5,600 28,001 to 29,000 pounds [12701.04 to 13154.18 kilograms] of excess weight = $5,800 29,001 to 30,000 pounds [13154.63 to 13607.77 kilograms] of excess weight = $6,000 An additional charge of $200 for every 1,000-pound [453.59-kilogram] increase over 30,000 pounds [13607.77 kilograms] consistent with the above formula.

Click to view

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 257, § 7; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1217; S.L. 1981, ch. 399, § 2; 2003, ch. 319, § 7.

39-12-18.
Payment of charges — Confiscation — Sale.

If the charges and costs as provided in section 39-12-17 are not paid immediately from a cash bond previously posted or other cash payment, the judge shall order the vehicle confiscated and sold by the sheriff of the county at a public sale to the highest bidder and the proceeds applied to the payment of the charges and costs assessed under the provisions of sections 39-12-11 through 39-12-22.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 257, § 8; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1218.

39-12-19.
Payment — Effect.

The payment of charges may not be construed as a payment for the future use of highways, streets, or roads by vehicles carrying excess loads.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 257, § 9; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1219.

39-12-20.
Proceeds of sale — Continuing appropriation.

The proceeds of sale must be deposited with the state treasurer. For a violation on an interstate or a state highway, the state treasurer shall deposit in the state highway fund an amount equal to the amount of the charges assessed under section 39-12-17 after paying the costs to the county. For any violation, an amount equal to the costs of the proceedings, including attorney’s and witness fees and costs, is appropriated on a continuing basis out of the funds collected to the county of prosecution for the purpose of defraying the costs of prosecution. From the proceeds of sale for a violation that did not occur on an interstate or a state highway, the amount of charges assessed under section 39-12-17 is appropriated on a continuing basis and must be deposited in the general fund in the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred and must be used for the support of the road system of that jurisdiction. The balance of the proceeds of any sale after the payment of costs and charges is appropriated on a continuing basis out of the funds collected to be paid to the person entitled to the proceeds as determined by the court or must be deposited with the clerk of court for payment to that person.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 257, § 10; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1220; S.L. 1985, ch. 441, § 3; 1999, ch. 37, § 27; 2013, ch. 306, § 2; 2017, ch. 273, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 3 of chapter 306, S.L. 2013 provides: “

EXPIRATION DATE.

This Act is effective through June 30, 2017, and after that date is ineffective.”

39-12-21.
Penalty.

Any driver of a vehicle who refuses to stop and submit the vehicle and load to a weighing when directed to do so by any police officer or any agent of this state having police powers relating to motor vehicles is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 257, § 11; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1221; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 440.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses, penalties, see § 12.1-32-01.

39-12-22.
Permissible loads — Exceptions.

When any motor truck, truck tractor, or trailer is operated upon the public highways of this state carrying a load in excess of the maximum prescribed under the provisions of sections 39-12-03 and 39-12-05 or other maximum weight limitations prescribed by law, the load must be reduced or shifted to within such maximum limitations before being permitted to operate on any public highway of this state; provided, however, that any such vehicle carrying a load of livestock is exempt from the limitations prescribed in section 39-12-05.3, relating to the carrying capacity of any wheel, tire, axle, or group of axles when excessive weight is caused by a shifting of the weight of the livestock. All material unloaded as required by this section must be cared for by the owner or operator of such vehicle at the risk of such owner or operator.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 257, § 12; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1222; 2021, ch. 280, § 5, effective August 1, 2021.

39-12-23.
Governor’s order authorizing excess limits.

The governor of this state is hereby authorized, by order of general application, to permit and prescribe definite excess limitations as to size and weight for the operation of motor vehicles in emergencies and to meet unusual conditions for the general welfare of the public.

The operation of such vehicles, in accordance with the governor’s order, does not constitute a violation of the statutes relative to limitations on sizes and weights.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 269, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1223.

39-12-24.
Authority for cooperative regional permit agreements on excess size or weight vehicles. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 287, § 1; repealed by 2021, ch. 280, § 7, effective August 1, 2021.

39-12-25.
Bank of North Dakota — Line of credit. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 284, § 3; repealed by 2021, ch. 280, § 7, effective August 1, 2021.